src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@jäädav+A:@P.NomStem.First@j´äädav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@jääv+A:@P.NomStem.First@j´ääv MAGUS ;
kaalutlev+A:kaalutlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaaluv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´aaluv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaasnev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´aasnev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kaduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaebav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´aebav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´aetav MAGUS ;
kahanev+A:kahanev MAGUS ;
kahetsetav+A:kahetsetav MAGUS ;
kahetsev+A:kahetsev MAGUS ;
kahjustav+A:kahjustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kahtlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ahtlev MAGUS ;
kahtlustatav+A:kahtlustatav MAGUS ;
kahtlustav+A:kahtlustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaitstav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´aitstav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaklev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´aklev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kalduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´alduv MAGUS ;
kandideeriv+A:kan,did´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kanduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´anduv MAGUS ;
kannatav+A:kannatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kantav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´antav MAGUS ;
karastav+A:karastav MAGUS ;
karistatav+A:karistatav MAGUS ;
karistav+A:karistav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@karjuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´arjuv MAGUS ;
karvendav+A:karvendav MAGUS ;
kasutav+A:kasutav MAGUS ;
kasvatatav+A:kasvatatav MAGUS ;
kasvatav+A:kasvatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kasvav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´asvav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@katkev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´atkev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kattuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´attuv MAGUS ;
kaubeldav+A:kaubeldav MAGUS ;
kaugenev+A:kaugenev MAGUS ;
kaunistav+A:kaunistav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kauplev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´auplev MAGUS ;
kavandatav+A:kavandatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´eelav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´eelduv MAGUS ;
keelustav+A:keelustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´eerduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´eerlev MAGUS ;
keerutav+A:keerutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´eev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´eev%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@kehtiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ehtiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kehv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ehv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@kelkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´el,kiv MAGUS ;
kenitlev+A:kenitlev MAGUS ;
kergendav+A:kergendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kerjav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´erjav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kerkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´erkiv MAGUS ;
kestendav+A:kestendav MAGUS ;
ketendav+A:ketendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kiduv MAGUS ;
kihisev+A:kihisev MAGUS ;
kihutav+A:kihutav MAGUS ;
kiidetav+A:kiidetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiirgav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iirgav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiirguv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iirguv MAGUS ;
kiirustav+A:kiirustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiiskav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iiskav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiitlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iitlev MAGUS ;
kikitav+A:kikitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kilav+A:@P.NomStem.First@kilav MAGUS ;
kilgendav+A:kilgendav MAGUS ;
kinnitav+A:kin,nitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kippuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ippuv MAGUS ;
kiratsev+A:kiratsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kirev+A:@P.NomStem.First@kirev MAGUS ;
kirjeldatav+A:kirjeldatav MAGUS ;
kirjeldav+A:kirjeldav MAGUS ;
kirjutav+A:kirjutav MAGUS ;
kisendav+A:kisendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiskuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iskuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiunuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iunuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiusav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iusav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@klantsiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kl´an,tsiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kleepuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kl´eepuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kloppiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kl´oppiv MAGUS ;
kobrutav+A:kobrutav MAGUS ;
kogunev+A:kogunev MAGUS ;
kogutav+A:kogutav MAGUS ;
kohaldatav+A:kohaldatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kohev+A:@P.NomStem.First@kohev MAGUS ;
kohisev+A:kohisev MAGUS ;
kohustav+A:kohustav MAGUS ;
kohutav+A:kohutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kohuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kohuv MAGUS ;
koketeeriv+A:koket´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kolksuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´olksuv MAGUS ;
kollendav+A:kollendav MAGUS ;
konkureeriv+A:konkur´eeriv MAGUS ;
kontakteeruv+A:kontakt´eeruv MAGUS ;
kontrollitav+A:kontr`ol,litav MAGUS ;
kontrolliv+A:kontr´ol,liv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@koolev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´oolE2v MAGUS ;
koolitatav+A:kool,itatav MAGUS ;
koondatav+A:k´oondatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@koondav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´oondav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@koonduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´oonduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@koormav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´oormav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@koosnev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´oosnev MAGUS ;
koostatav+A:k´oostatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kootav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ootav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@korduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´orduv MAGUS ;
korisev+A:korisev MAGUS ;
korraldatav+A:korraldatav MAGUS ;
korraldav+A:korraldav MAGUS ;
korrutatav+A:korrutatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kortsuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ortsuv MAGUS ;
kosutav+A:kosutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kraaksuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kr´aaksuv MAGUS ;
krabisev+A:krabisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kriiskav+A:@P.NomStem.First@kr´iiskav MAGUS ;
kritiseeritav+A:kritiseeritav MAGUS ;
kritiseeriv+A:kritis´eeriv MAGUS ;
krõbisev+A:krõbisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuhjuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´uhjuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuivav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´uivav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´uiv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kujundav+A:kujundav MAGUS ;
kujunev+A:kujunev MAGUS ;
kujutav+A:kujutav MAGUS ;
kujuteldav+A:kujut´eldav MAGUS ;
kujutletav+A:kujutletav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kukkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ukkuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kulgev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ulgev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuluv+A:@P.NomStem.First@kuluv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kumav+A:@P.NomStem.First@kumav MAGUS ;
kumerduv+A:kumerduv MAGUS ;
kumisev+A:kumisev MAGUS ;
kummastav+A:kummastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurnav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´urnav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kusev+A:@P.NomStem.First@kusev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kustuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ustuv MAGUS ;
kutsutav+A:kutsutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutsuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´utsuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuuldav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´uuldav MAGUS ;
kuulutav+A:kuulutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuuluv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´uuluv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuumav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´uumav MAGUS ;
kõdunev+A:kõdunev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kõhklev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´õhklev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kõikuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´õikuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kõlav+A:@P.NomStem.First@kõlav MAGUS ;
kõlisev+A:kõlisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kõndiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´õn,div MAGUS ;
kõnelev+A:kõnelev MAGUS ;
kõrgenev+A:kõrgenev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kõrguv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´õrguv MAGUS ;
kõrvaldatav+A:kõrvaldatav MAGUS ;
kõrvetav+A:kõrvetav MAGUS ;
kähisev+A:kähisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@käibiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´äibiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@käidav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´äidav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@käiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´äiv MAGUS ;
käivituv+A:käivituv MAGUS ;
käratsev+A:käratsev MAGUS ;
kärisev+A:kärisev MAGUS ;
käsitletav+A:käsitletav MAGUS ;
käsitlev+A:käsitlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@käskiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´äs,kiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kääriv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ääriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@köetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´öetav MAGUS ;
kükitav+A:kükitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@külgnev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ül,gnev MAGUS ;
külmetav+A:külmetav MAGUS ;
küpsetav+A:küpsetav MAGUS ;
küsitav+A:küsitav MAGUS ;
küsitletav+A:küsitletav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@küsiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@küsiv MAGUS ;
kütkestav+A:kütkestav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@küündiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´üündiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@küütlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´üütlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laastav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´aastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laekuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´aekuv MAGUS ;
laevatatav+A:laevatatav MAGUS ;
lagundav+A:lagundav MAGUS ;
lagunev+A:lagunev MAGUS ;
lahendatav+A:lahendatav MAGUS ;
